Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1801
Inquest; when authorized; coroner's
jury; compensation.

(1) The
coroner shall hold an inquest upon the dead bodies of such persons only as
are supposed to have died by unlawful means. When the coroner has notice of
the presence in the county of the body of a person supposed to have died by
unlawful means, the coroner may, at his or her discretion, issue a warrant
to a sheriff of the county requiring the sheriff to summon six residents of
the county to appear before the coroner at a time and place named in the warrant.

(2) Each juror shall receive
for each day employed in the discharge of his or her duty the sum of twenty
dollars to be paid by certificate drawn by the coroner on the general funds
of the county.

(3) A juror may voluntarily
waive payment under this section for his or her service as a juror.

Laws 1879, § 97, p. 380;

R.S.1913, § 5663;

Laws 1915, c. 101, § 1, p. 244;

C.S.1922, § 4993;

Laws 1923, c. 109, § 1, p. 267;

C.S.1929, § 26-1502;

R.S.1943, § 23-1801;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 69;

Laws 1987, LB 313, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB865, § 2.

This article is incorporated into law which requires the county attorney to perform the duties of coroner. State ex rel. Crosby v. Moorhead, 100 Neb. 298, 159 N.W. 412 (1916).

Coroner has jurisdiction, though person may have been injured or died in another county. Moore v. Box Butte County, 78 Neb. 561, 111 N.W. 469 (1907).

Coroner can lawfully hold inquest upon bodies of persons supposed to have died by unlawful means. He is not entitled to fees unless a jury is summoned. Lancaster County v. Holyoke, 37 Neb. 328, 55 N.W. 950 (1893).